New York, session 2025-2026, S4801.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 605 of the public health law, as 2 amended by section 2 of part E of chapter 57 of the laws of 2022, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 2. State aid reimbursement for public health services provided by a 5 municipality under this title, shall be made if the municipality is 6 providing some or all of the core public health services identified in 7 section six hundred two of this title, pursuant to an approved applica- 8 tion for state aid, at a rate of no less than thirty-six per centum[, 9 except for the city of New York which shall receive no less than twenty 10 per centum,] of the difference between the amount of moneys expended by 11 the municipality for public health services required by section six 12 hundred two of this title during the fiscal year and the base grant 13 provided pursuant to subdivision one of this section. Provided, howev- 14 er, that a municipality's documented fringe benefit costs submitted 15 under an application for state aid and otherwise eligible for reimburse- 16 ment under this article shall not exceed fifty per centum of the munici- 17 pality's eligible personnel services. No such reimbursement shall be 18 provided for services that are not eligible for state aid pursuant to 19 this article. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06284-01-5